Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4901.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17211. (1) An individual shall not engage in the practice of nursing or the practice of nursing as a licensed practical nurse unless he or she the individual is licensed or is otherwise authorized by this article. (2) The following words, titles, or letters or a combination of the words, titles, or letters, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those persons individuals authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed in this part: (a) "Registered professional nurse", "registered nurse", "r.n.", "licensed practical nurse", "l.p.n.", "nurse midwife", "certified nurse midwife", "c.n.m.", "advanced practice registered nurse", "a.p.r.n.", "nurse anesthetist", "nurse practitioner", "n.p.", "certified nurse practitioner", and "c.n.p.". (b) Beginning 12 months after the effective date of the rules promulgated under section 17210(2), "clinical nurse specialist", "c.n.s.", "clinical nurse specialist-certified", and "c.n.s.-c.". (3) Unless a longer license cycle is prescribed by rule under section 16194, the license cycle for a registered professional nurse and a licensed practical nurse is 3 years. Sec. 17603. (1) Beginning the effective date of this part, an An individual shall not use the titles "speech-language pathologist", "speech pathologist", "speech therapist", "speech correctionist", "speech clinician", "language therapist", "language pathologist", "logopedist", "communicologist", "aphasiologist", "phoniatrist", "voice therapist", and "voice pathologist", or similar words that indicate that the individual is a speech-language pathologist, unless the individual is licensed under this part as a speech-language pathologist. (2) Unless a longer license cycle is prescribed by rule under section 16194, the license cycle for a speech-language pathologist is 3 years.